Tennessee statutes. Title 11 Natural Areas and Recreation
Part 7

Technical Assistance and Services

11-4-701. Technical assistance.

The division is authorized to provide technical forestry information, advice, and related assistance to landowners, managers, forest operators, wood processors, agencies, organizations, and individuals. Such assistance and services may include:

Inspection and examination of forest lands and forest products processing operations;

Management planning and advice and recommendations concerning reforestation, silvicultural practices, timber sale preparation, and other activities that improve the forest resource;

Advice and consultation regarding:

Harvesting, processing, and marketing of wood and wood products; and

Management of trees and forests within urban areas;

Protection of forest soil and the quality and quantity of water;

Protection of the forest resource from insects, disease, and other pests;

Enhancement of wildlife habitat and forest recreation opportunities;

Authority to provide forestry vendor services at approximate cost;

Preparation and distribution of educational materials; and

Management of trees in urban areas.

Acts 1986, ch. 652, § 35.

11-4-702. Cooperative urban forestry program.

The division is hereby authorized to make grants using federal and/or state funds to qualifying cities, towns, municipalities, and other communities for purposes of establishing cooperative urban forestry programs. The division is authorized to develop policies and procedures for implementation of the urban forestry grant program.

Acts 1986, ch. 652, § 36.

11-4-703. Assistance to forest landowner associations.

In order to promote forestry on nonindustrial privately owned lands, the division is authorized to provide assistance in the establishment of forest landowner associations which encourage and promote improved forest protection, management, reforestation, and forest products marketing and utilization.

Acts 1986, ch. 652, § 37.